Arkansas, session 2025, SB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 92, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-92-107. Mandated costs and fees — Defendant refunded — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "mandated costs and fees" includes
without limitation any sum that is required to be paid by the defendant that
is associated with being subject to a prosecution, including without
limitation court filing costs and fees, service costs and fees, ignition
interlock device costs and fees, pretrial supervision costs and fees, and
ankle monitor costs and fees.
(b) Any mandated costs and fees paid by a defendant in a criminal case
shall be refunded to the defendant if:
(1) He or she is acquitted of the charge or charges; or
(2) The charge or charges are otherwise dismissed or an order of
*CEB233*
03/20/2025 3:21:18 PM CEB233

SB549
nolle prosequi is entered.
(c) If a defendant is acquitted of one (1) or more charges or if an
order of dismissal or nolle prosequi is entered for one (1) or more charges
but he or she is convicted of the remaining charge or charges in the case,
only the mandated costs and fees paid by the defendant that are specifically
associated with the charge or charges described in subsection (b) of this
section shall be refunded to the defendant.





























03/20/2025 3:21:18 PM CEB233